Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 6. Creditable Service.

§ 51.1-140.
Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 696, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

51.1-140

, pertaining to prior service credit statement, derived from 1952, c. 157, §§ 51-111.39, 51-111.41, 51-111.42; 1954, c. 643; 1956, cc. 560, 593; 1962, c. 517; 1966, c. 174; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-141.
Service equivalents.

The Board shall determine how much service in any month is the equivalent of a month of service or how much service in any year is the equivalent of a year of service. The Board shall not allow more than one year of service credit for all service rendered in any period of twelve consecutive months.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.40; 1956, c. 560; 1990, c. 832.

§§ 51.1-142,
51.1-142.1.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to prior service or membership credit for certain members, and service credit for accumulated sick leave, see §

51.1-142.2

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 484, cl. 3 provides that benefits payable upon the retirement or death of a member prior to July 1, 1990, shall be determined under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 51 of the Code of Virginia as it existed prior to July 1, 1990.

Acts 1990, c. 832, cl. 3 provides: “That any person who was employed by the Virginia Crime Commission from March 29, 1974 through June 30, 1985, and who was denied membership in the Virginia Supplemental Retirement System because of having attained age sixty when first employed may purchase all or any portion of service lost as a result of such denial upon payment in a lump sum of the amount the person would have contributed had he been allowed to participate in the retirement system.
The requirement that a person must be in service to purchase service shall be waived.
Upon the purchase of the service, retirement benefits may be applied for and any requirement as to the person being in service shall be waived.”

Acts 1995, c. 620, cl. 2, provides: “That full-time employees of the General Assembly who were previously employed by the General Assembly on a temporary basis for at least one regular session shall receive retirement credit for such service. As used herein, ‘full-time employees of the General Assembly’ shall include, but not be limited to, employees of legislative branch agencies and secretaries and administrative assistants of members of the General Assembly, but shall not include members of the General Assembly. Notwithstanding Item 1B of Chapter 966 of the 1994 Acts of Assembly, including any amendment and reenactment thereof, such secretaries and administrative assistants shall receive retirement credit for services rendered as employees of the General Assembly only as provided in this act. Upon written application to the Clerk of the House of Delegates or the Clerk of the Senate, or the head of the legislative branch agency, as appropriate, received on or before August 30, 1995, such credit shall be computed as one year of service for each calendar year in which such employee served at a session of the General Assembly. Such additional service credit may be purchased at the rate set forth in §

51.1-143

. The cost of the first five years of such additional service credit shall be borne by the current employer. Full-time employees of a legislative branch agency who were previously employed by an agency in the executive branch on a temporary basis for at least three years shall be eligible to purchase retirement credit for such service at the rate set forth in §

51.1-143

, at the employee’s expense, upon written application to the head of the legislative branch agency received on or before August 30, 1995. The amount representing the member contribution to retirement benefits shall be the same as provided in §

51.1-144

.”

Acts 1998, c. 746, cl. 2, effective April 16, 1998, provides: “That any active member of the General Assembly who is receiving a retirement allowance while in service as a member of the General Assembly based solely on such member’s service as a member of the General Assembly, as permitted by subsection B of §

51.1-155

as it existed prior to the effective date of this act [April 16, 1998], combined with any purchased service as permitted in §§

51.1-142

and

51.1-143

, shall be prospectively unretired and placed in active duty status as provided for other state employees generally pursuant to Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia. However, any such member, at his option, may be retroactively unretired by repaying any such sums he may have received, with interest thereon at the rate set forth in subsection C of §

51.1-147

. Any such member who purchased service as permitted in §§

51.1-142

and

51.1-143

shall be provided an opportunity to rescind such purchase of service and request a refund of any such purchased service.”

Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697, cl. 4, provide: “That any rights granted under §§

51.1-142

,

51.1-142

.1 and

51.1-143

, as such rights existed in these sections immediately before the effective date of this act, and only to the extent that such rights conflict with the provisions of this act, shall remain in effect until July 1, 2002.”

§ 51.1-142.2.
Prior service or membership credit for certain members; service credit for accumulated sick leave.

Certain members may purchase credit for service as provided in this section.

Any member in service may purchase service credit from the following categories of service or leave: (i) leave of absence for educational purposes that was previously approved by the member’s employer; (ii) leave of absence for a serious health condition of the member or of an immediate family member, all as defined in the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq., as amended, and previously certified by the member’s employer; (iii) up to one year of service credit per occurrence of leave for any unpaid leave of absence due to the birth, adoption, or death of a qualifying child, as defined in §

51.1-500

; (iv) service as a full-time employee of another state, a public school system of another state, or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth or another state, as certified by such state, public school system, or political subdivision; (v) full-time service of a political subdivision of this state not credited to the member under an agreement as provided for in §

51.1-143.1

, as certified by such political subdivision; (vi) full-time civilian service of the United States; (vii) full-time service at a private institution of higher education if the private institution is merged with a public institution of higher education and graduates of the private institution are then issued new degrees from the public institution; or (viii) any period of time when the member was employed part time or in a wage position by a participating employer and not otherwise eligible to participate in the retirement system because the member was not an employee as defined in §

51.1-124.3

. However, no member in service shall be allowed to purchase more than a total of four years of service credit pursuant to this subdivision.
A. 1. Any member in service may purchase service credit from the following categories of service or leave: (i) leave of absence for educational purposes that was previously approved by the member’s employer; (ii) leave of absence for a serious health condition of the member or of an immediate family member, all as defined in the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq., as amended, and previously certified by the member’s employer; (iii) up to one year of service credit per occurrence of leave for any unpaid leave of absence due to the birth, adoption, or death of a qualifying child, as defined in §

51.1-500

; (iv) service as a full-time employee of another state, a public school system of another state, or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth or another state, as certified by such state, public school system, or political subdivision; (v) full-time service of a political subdivision of this state not credited to the member under an agreement as provided for in §

51.1-143.1

, as certified by such political subdivision; (vi) full-time civilian service of the United States; (vii) full-time service at a private institution of higher education if the private institution is merged with a public institution of higher education and graduates of the private institution are then issued new degrees from the public institution; or (viii) any period of time when the member was employed part time or in a wage position by a participating employer and not otherwise eligible to participate in the retirement system because the member was not an employee as defined in §

51.1-124.3

. However, no member in service shall be allowed to purchase more than a total of four years of service credit pursuant to this subdivision.

In addition to the service credit that may be purchased under subdivision 1, any member in service may purchase up to four years of service credit for prior active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States, provided that the discharge from a period of active duty status with the armed forces was not dishonorable.

The service credit to be credited to a member under this subsection shall be calculated at the ratio of one year, or portion thereof, of service credit to one year, or portion thereof, of service purchased, except for employment service purchased under clause (viii) of subdivision 1, which shall be calculated at the ratio of one month of service credit for each 173 hours of service as certified by the employer.For each year or portion thereof to be credited at the time of purchase under this subsection, the member shall pay the approximate normal cost of the retirement plan under which the member is covered at the time of such purchase, as determined by the Board in its sole discretion. If the member does not purchase, or enter into a purchase of service credit contract for, the service made available in this subsection within the first 24 months of the member’s active service following his first date of hire or the final day of any applicable leave of absence, as applicable, then, for each year or portion thereof to be credited at the time of purchase, the member shall pay the actuarial equivalent cost. To the extent the member becomes inactive during the 24 months following his first date of hire or the final day of any applicable leave of absence, such periods shall not be included in the 24 months of active service.Except as otherwise required by Chapter 1223 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended, no service credit may be purchased under this section if it is included in the calculation of any retirement allowance received or to be received by the member from this or another retirement system, or if there is a balance in a defined contribution account that serves as a primary retirement account related to such service.For purposes of this subsection, “active duty military service” means full-time service of at least 180 consecutive days in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, Coast Guard, or reserve components thereof.

Any member in service may purchase all prior service credit for creditable service lost from ceasing to be a member under this chapter, as provided in §

51.1-128

, because of the withdrawal of his accumulated contributions. For each year or portion thereof to be credited at the time of purchase under this subsection, the member shall pay the withdrawn amount to be purchased plus interest accrued daily and compounded annually from the date of withdrawal to the date of payment at the assumed rate of return established by the Board for the actuarial valuation of the retirement system that is in effect at the time of the purchase. The Board shall develop guidelines and procedures for administering this subsection.

Any member in service may purchase service credit for accumulated sick leave on his effective date of retirement based upon such sums as the employer may provide as payment for any unused sick leave balances. The cost of service credit purchased under this subsection shall be the actuarial equivalent cost of such service.

Any member receiving benefits under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.) may, in a manner prescribed by the Board and prior to the effective date of retirement, purchase service that is not reported to the retirement system by the member’s employer while the member is receiving such benefits.For each year or portion thereof to be credited at the time of purchase under this subsection, the member shall pay the approximate normal cost of the retirement plan under which the member is covered, as determined by the Board in its sole discretion. If the member does not purchase, or enter into a purchase of service credit contract for, any service made available in this subsection within the first 24 months of the member’s active service following his first date of hire or the final day of any applicable leave of absence, then, for each year or portion thereof to be credited at the time of purchase, the member shall pay the actuarial equivalent cost. To the extent the member becomes inactive during the 24 months following his first date of hire or the final day of any applicable leave of absence, such periods shall not be included in the 24 months of active service.

Payment may be made in a lump sum at the time of purchase or by payroll deduction. Any number of additional deductions may be permitted at any time. Should any deduction be terminated before the member purchases the entire period contracted for, the member shall be credited with the number of full or partial months of service for which full payment has been made. If any deduction is continued after the entire period has been purchased, the member shall be credited with no more than the amount of service for which he was eligible and for which he paid, and the excess amount deducted shall be refunded to the member.

Any employer may elect to pay an equivalent amount in lieu of all member contributions required of its employees for the purchase of service credit pursuant to this section. These contributions shall not be considered wages for purposes of Chapter 7 (§

51.1-700

et seq.), nor shall they be considered salary for purposes of this chapter.

In any case where member and employer contributions, as required under this chapter, were not made because of an error in the payroll, personnel, or other classification system of an employer participating in the retirement system, service that has not been credited because of such error may be purchased on the following basis:

The most recent three years of service credit shall be purchased, using applicable member and employer contribution rates and creditable compensation in effect for such period, in a manner and at the cost prescribed by the Board; and

All other years of service credit shall be purchased by the employer at an actuarial equivalent cost.

Any member may receive credit at no cost for service rendered in the armed forces of the United States provided (i) the member was on leave of absence from a covered position, (ii) the discharge from a period of active duty with the armed forces was not dishonorable, (iii) the member has not withdrawn his accumulated contributions, (iv) the member is not disabled or killed while on leave without pay while performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States, and (v) the member reenters service in a covered position within one year after discharge from the armed forces. In order to receive such service, the member must complete such forms and other requirements as are required by the Board and the retirement system.

History.

2001, cc. 686, 697; 2003, c. 7; 2005, c. 292; 2006, c. 635; 2007, c. 89; 2008, c. 27; 2009, c. 362; 2010, cc. 737, 738; 2011, cc. 722, 880; 2012, cc. 696, 701, 823; 2014, c. 356; 2015, cc. 508, 536; 2016, cc. 263, 280; 2018, cc. 53, 305.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697, cl. 4, provide: “That any rights granted under §§

51.1-142

,

51.1-142

.1 and

51.1-143

, as such rights existed in these sections immediately before the effective date of this act, and only to the extent that such rights conflict with the provisions of this act, shall remain in effect until July 1, 2002.”

Acts 2010, cc. 737 and 738, cl. 2 provides: “That the effective date of the initial determinations of the normal cost rates referred to in subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-142.2

of the Code of Virginia shall be January 1, 2011. Therefore, for a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, the applicable one-year period under subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-142.2

for purchasing service at the aforementioned normal cost rates shall begin no earlier than January 1, 2011.”

Acts 2010, cc. 737 and 738, cl. 3 provides: “That any person who prior to March 15, 2010, has entered into a written contract for employment in a covered position, for retirement purposes under Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall not be deemed to be a ‘person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010,’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

of the Code of Virginia solely because the person commences employment pursuant to the contract on or after July 1, 2010.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 7 deleted the former second sentence of subsection G, which read: “No period of service rendered through reenlistment beyond the cessation of hostilities shall be creditable service.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 292 added the language beginning “unless the member in service is purchasing” in the second sentence of subdivisions A 1 and 2 and in subsection C; in subdivision B 1, inserted “a period of active duty status with” in clause (i) of the introductory paragraph and added the last paragraph; in subsection E, substituted “an employer” for “a locality” in the introductory paragraph and “the employer shall purchase” for “shall be purchased” in subdivision E 2; and inserted “a period of active duty with” in clause (ii) of the first sentence in subsection G.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 635, in subdivision B 1, inserted clause (v) and redesignated former clause (v) as clause (vi).

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 89 substituted “subdivision B 2” for “subdivision B 3” in the last sentence of subdivision A 1.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 27, in subsection F, substituted “clause (vi) of subdivision B 1” for “clause (v) of subdivision B 1” in the first sentence and “clauses (i) through (vi) of subdivision B 1” for “clauses (i) through (v) of subdivision B 1” in the second sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 362, in subsection G, inserted clause (iv) and made related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and rewrote subsection A; and in the third sentence of subsection C, deleted “either” following “member” and “or by July 1, 2004, whichever is later” following “purchase the service.” For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 722, in subdivision A 3, substituted “Any number of” for “Only one,” “deductions may” for “deduction shall” in the third sentence, and inserted “full or partial” following “shall be credited with the number of additional” in the fourth sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment by c. 880 added subsection E and redesignated the following subsections accordingly; and substituted “clauses (i) and (ii) of subdivision B 2” for “clause (i) and (ii) of subdivision B 2” at the end of the second sentence of subsection G.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 696 deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 7 (§

51.1-700

et seq.)” in the last sentence of the last paragraph in subsection A; and rewrote subsection E, which formerly read: “Any member receiving work-related disability benefits under Article 4 (§

51.1-1119

et seq.) of Chapter 11 may, in a manner prescribed by the Board, purchase service credit for service that is not reported to the retirement system by the member’s employer while the member is receiving short-term disability benefits. Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the cost to purchase such service shall be five percent of the member’s creditable compensation.”

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and inserted “or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013,” in the first sentence of subdivision A 1. Further stylistic changes were made by c. 701.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356, in subsection C, inserted “provided, however, that the applicable cost for a person enrolled in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

shall be four percent” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 508, effective January 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment by c. 536 substituted “birth, adoption, or death of a qualifying child, as defined in §

51.1-500

” for “birth or adoption of a child” in subdivision B 2.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 263 and 280 are identical, and in subdivision A 1, substituted “qualifying child” for “qualified child” in clause (iii); and substituted “subsection” for “section” in the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 53 and 305 are identical, and inserted “full-time” in clause (vi) of subdivision A 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Time spent “employed.” —

Time spent as a local elected official does not constitute time spent “employed” by the locality and, therefore, is not time purchasable as prior service under subdivision B 1 (v). See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William H. Leighty, Director, Virginia Retirement System, 01-129 (1/10/02).

§ 51.1-142.3.
Purchase of additional prior service credit by certain school division superintendents.

In addition to the four years of prior service credit that may be purchased under clause (iv) of subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-142.2

, a school division superintendent appointed by a school board pursuant to § 22.1-60, with at least five years of creditable service in the Retirement System, may purchase up to a maximum of 10 additional years of prior service credit for creditable service of another state or of a political subdivision, or public school system of this or another state, as certified by such state, political subdivision, or public school system. Except as otherwise required by Chapter 1223 of Title 10 of the United States Code, the service credit made available under this section may not be purchased if, before being purchased or at the time of such purchase pursuant to this section, the service to be purchased is service that is included in the calculation of any retirement allowance received or to be received by the member from this or any other retirement system.The school board that has appointed such school division superintendent may purchase such prior service credit on behalf of the school division superintendent.

The cost at the time of purchase for each additional year of service credit (or portion thereof) pursuant to this section, shall be 10 percent of the school division superintendent’s creditable compensation or 10 percent of the school division superintendent’s average final compensation, whichever is greater, provided that the service credit to be purchased is paid for in one lump-sum payment within one year after the school division superintendent first became eligible to purchase such service credit or by July 1, 2004, whichever is later.A school division superintendent shall first become eligible to purchase prior service credit under this section as follows:

For members in service on June 30, 2003, and July 1, 2003, upon attaining five years of creditable service as a school division superintendent in the Retirement System;

For members in service on June 30, 2003, and July 1, 2003, who become a school division superintendent on or after July 1, 2003, upon attaining five years of creditable service as a school division superintendent in the Retirement System; and

For members not in service on June 30, 2003, upon the member earning five years of creditable service as a school division superintendent in the Retirement System for service performed after June 30, 2003.

In any case in which prior service credit pursuant to this section has been purchased by or on behalf of a school division superintendent, if the school division superintendent, subsequent to the date of such purchase, does not remain in such position with the local school board for at least the number of years purchased: (i) the Retirement System shall reduce the creditable service credited to the school division superintendent by an amount equivalent to the number of years of prior service purchased less the number of years served by the person as a school division superintendent with the local school board subsequent to the date of such purchase. Such reduction in creditable service shall be deemed to be forfeited by the school division superintendent for purposes of this chapter and the contributions representing that forfeited service shall be refunded to the school division superintendent; and (ii) the school division superintendent shall be liable to the local school board for the amount paid by the local school board for purchasing the forfeited prior service credit.

If a school division superintendent does not purchase the prior service credit described in subsection A within the timeframe provided in subsection B, such prior service credit may be purchased at the actuarial equivalent cost, provided that in no case shall any person purchase more than 10 years of such prior service credit under this section.

History.

2003, c. 947; 2015, c. 508.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 508, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “(iv) of subdivision A 1” for “(ii) of subdivision B 1” in subsection A.

§ 51.1-143.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 813, which added subsection C of §

51.1-143

, provides in cl. 2: “That an emergency exists and the provisions of this act shall become effective on the first day of the third month following the date that the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System obtains a ruling from the Internal Revenue Service that affirmatively states that the provisions of this act do not affect the status of the retirement system as a qualified plan for federal income tax purposes.” A favorable ruling was received on January 19, 1999, stating that the provisions of the 1998 act do not affect the status of the retirement system.

§ 51.1-143.1.
Portability of service credit between the Virginia Retirement System and certain political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

The Virginia Retirement System may enter into an agreement with any political subdivision of the Commonwealth which has a defined benefit plan that is not supplemental to the Retirement System to permit any vested member of the political subdivision’s plan, upon entering service in a covered position and filing a written application with the Retirement System, to purchase service credit, of an amount to be determined by the Board of Trustees, in the Retirement System. The purchase shall be accomplished by and upon the transfer of assets to the Retirement System from the political subdivision’s plan as provided in the agreement.

History.

1996, cc. 939, 990.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 939 and 990, cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat creditable service attributable to service rendered in a part-time elected position shall not be eligible for transfer under the terms of portability defined in §§

51.1-143.1

and

51.1-801.1

.”